tests/normal nouns - ending with ŋ.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "үзэсгэлэн /ucsklŋ/ = beauty":
    үзэсгэлэн /ucsklŋ/<n><nom> : үзэсгэлэн /ucsklŋ/
    үзэсгэлэн /ucsklŋ/<n><acc> : үзэсгэлэнг
    үзэсгэлэн /ucsklŋ/<n><gen> : үзэсгэлэнгийн
    үзэсгэлэн /ucsklŋ/<n><abl> : үзэсгэлэнгээс
    үзэсгэлэн /ucsklŋ/<n><dat> : үзэсгэлэнд
    үзэсгэлэн /ucsklŋ/<n><pl><nom> : үзэсгэлэнгүүд

 "сан = store":
    сан<n><nom> : сан
    сан<n><acc> : санг
    сан<n><gen> : сангийн
    сан<n><abl> : сангаас
    сан<n><dat> : санд

 "номын сан = library":
    номын сан<n><nom> : номын сан
    номын сан<n><acc> : номын санг
    номын сан<n><gen> : номын сангийн
    номын сан<n><abl> : номын сангаас
    номын сан<n><dat> : номын санд
    номын сан<n><pl><nom> : номын сангууд
